cs: Typ lodní převodovky: Přímý pohon; Hydraulická; Saildrive; V-drive; Jiná
zh-CN: 船用传动类型: 直驱; 液压; 帆船驱动; V 型驱动; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul de transmisie marină: Transmisie directă; Hidraulică; Saildrive; V-drive; Altele
fi: Merivaihteiston tyyppi: Suoraveto; Hydraulinen; Saildrive; V-vaihde; Muu
pt-PT: Tipo de transmissão marítima: Transmissão direta; Hidráulica; Saildrive; V-drive; Outro
ko: 선박용 변속기 유형: 다이렉트 드라이브; 유압식; 세일드라이브; V-드라이브; 기타
nl: Type scheepstransmissie: Directe aandrijving; Hydraulisch; Saildrive; V-drive; Anders
sl-SI: Vrsta navtičnega menjalnika: Neposredni pogon; Hidravlični; Saildrive; V-pogon; Drugo
de: Schiffsantriebsart: Direktantrieb; Hydraulisch; Saildrive; V-Antrieb; Sonstige
sv: Typ av marindrivlina: Direktdrift; Hydraulisk; S-drev; V-drev; Annat
bg-BG: Тип морска трансмисия: Директно задвижване; Хидравлична; Saildrive; V-drive; Друго
es: Tipo de transmisión marina: Transmisión directa; Hidráulica; Saildrive; V-drive; Otro
hr-HR: Vrsta pomorskog prijenosa: Izravni pogon; Hidraulični; Saildrive pogon; V-pogon; Ostalo
it: Tipo di trasmissione marina: Trasmissione diretta; Idraulica; Saildrive; V-drive; Altro
pl: Typ przekładni morskiej: Napęd bezpośredni; Napęd hydrauliczny; Napęd typu Saildrive; Napęd typu V-drive; Inne
lt-LT: Jūrų transporto pavarų dėžės tipas: Tiesioginė pavara; Hidraulinė; Buriuotojo pavara (Saildrive); V formos pavara (V-drive); Kita
ru: Тип судовой трансмиссии: Прямой привод; Гидравлическая; Сейлдрайв; V-образный привод; Другое
nb: Type marint gir: Direktedrift; Hydraulisk; Seildrev; V-drev; Annet
vi: Loại hộp số dùng cho tàu thuyền: Dẫn động trực tiếp; Thủy lực; Saildrive; Dẫn động chữ V; Khác
pt-BR: Tipo de transmissão marinha: Transmissão direta; Hidráulico; Saildrive; V-drive; Outro
en: Marine transmission type: Direct drive; Hydraulic; Saildrive; V-drive; Other
el: Τύπος ναυτικού κιβωτίου ταχυτήτων.: Απευθείας μετάδοση; Υδραυλικό; Saildrive; V-drive; Άλλο
th: ประเภทระบบส่งกำลังสำหรับเรือ: ขับเคลื่อนโดยตรง; ไฮดรอลิก; เซลไดรฟ์; V-drive; อื่นๆ
ja: マリン伝送方式: ダイレクトドライブ; 油圧式; セイルドライブ; Vドライブ; その他
zh-TW: 船用變速箱類型: 直驅; 液壓; 帆船驅動; V 型驅動; 其他
tr: Deniz şanzıman tipi: Doğrudan tahrikli; Hidrolik; Saildrive; V-drive; Diğer
da: Marinetransmissionstype: Direkte drev; Hydraulisk; Sejldrev; V-drev; Andet
fr: Type de transmission marine: Prise directe; Hydraulique; Saildrive; V-drive; Autre
hu: Hajómotor hajtómű típusa: Közvetlen hajtás; Hidraulikus; Saildrive; V-hajtás; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ lodnej prevodovky: Priamy pohon; Hydraulická; Saildrive; V-drive; Iná